Colorado, session 2026A, HB1329.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-1105, amend
(2) and (5)(a); repeal (1), (3), and (5)(d); add (2.1); and add with
amended and relocated provisions (1.1) as follows:
42-4-1105. Racing - drag racing - street takeovers - stunt
driving - immobilization, impounding, or seizure of motor vehicle -
penalties - definitions.
(1) (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this
section, it is unlawful for a person to knowingly engage in a speed contest
on a highway.
(b) For purposes of this section, "speed contest" means the
operation of one or more motor vehicles to conduct a race or a time trial,
-2- HB26-1329

including but not limited to rapid acceleration, exceeding reasonable and
prudent speeds for highways and existing traffic conditions, vying for
position, or performing one or more lane changes in an attempt to gain
advantage over one or more of the other race participants.
(c) A person who violates any provision of this subsection (1)
commits a class 1 misdemeanor traffic offense.
(1.1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "BURNOUT" MEANS A MANEUVER PERFORMED BY A DRIVER OF
A MOTOR VEHICLE WHEREBY THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS KEPT STATIONARY,
OR IS IN MOTION, WHILE THE WHEELS ARE SPUN IN A MANNER THAT
DEFEATS FRICTION AND ALLOWS THE TIRES TO SPIN FREELY, WHICH MAY
THEN LEAD TO EXCESSIVE FRICTION AND CAUSE THE TIRES TO MELT.
(b) "CONVICTION" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
18-1.3-602 (2).
(c) "COORDINATED STREET TAKEOVER" MEANS FIVE OR MORE
MOTOR VEHICLES OPERATED BY DRIVERS IN AN ORGANIZED MANNER TO
EFFECT A STREET TAKEOVER.
(d) "DOUGHNUT" MEANS A MANEUVER PERFORMED BY A DRIVER
OF A MOTOR VEHICLE WHEREBY THE FRONT OR REAR OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE IS ROTATED AROUND THE OPPOSITE SET OF WHEELS IN A
CONTINUOUS MOTION, WHICH MAY CAUSE:
(I) A CIRCULAR TIRE-MARK PATTERN OF RUBBER ON THE DRIVING
SURFACE; OR
(II) THE TIRES OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE TO HEAT UP AND EMIT
SMOKE.
(e) "DRAG RACE" MEANS THE OPERATION OF TWO OR MORE MOTOR
-3- HB26-1329

VEHICLES BY DRIVERS WHO DRIVE:
(I) SIDE-BY-SIDE AT ACCELERATING SPEEDS IN A COMPETITIVE
ATTEMPT TO ACCELERATE FASTER OR OUTDISTANCE EACH OTHER; OR
(II) OVER A COMMON OR SELECTED COURSE FOR THE PURPOSE OF
COMPARING THE RELATIVE SPEED OR POWER OF ACCELERATION OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE OR MOTOR VEHICLES WITHIN A CERTAIN DISTANCE OR
TIME LIMIT.
(f) (I) "DRIFTING" OR "DRIFT" MEANS A MANEUVER PERFORMED BY
A DRIVER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE, AS PART OF A STREET TAKEOVER OR FOR
EXHIBITION, STUNT, OR PERFORMATIVE REASONS, WHEREBY THE DRIVER
INDUCES AND MAINTAINS AN OVERSTEERING ACTION TO CAUSE THE REAR
WHEELS OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE TO LOSE TRACTION WITH THE DRIVING
SURFACE AND THE MOTOR VEHICLE TO SLIDE SIDEWAYS IN A CONTROLLED
TURN OR ARC WITH THE FRONT WHEELS TURNED IN THE OPPOSITE
DIRECTION OF THE TURN OR ARC.
(II) "DRIFTING" OR "DRIFT" DOES NOT INCLUDE A CORRECTIVE
ACTION TAKEN BY A DRIVER TO REGAIN CONTROL OF A MOTOR VEHICLE
AFTER AN UNINTENDED LOSS OF CONTROL OR TRACTION CAUSED BY ROAD
CONDITIONS, WEATHER, OR AN EMERGENCY.
(g) [Formerly 42-4-1105 (5)(d)] For purposes of this section,
"Immobilization device" means a device locked into place over a wheel
of a motor vehicle that prevents the motor vehicle from being moved.
"Immobilization device" includes but is not limited to a device commonly
referred to as a "traffic boot" or "boot".
(h) (I) "MOTOR VEHICLE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
42-1-102 (58).
(II) "MOTOR VEHICLE" INCLUDES A MOTORCYCLE, AUTOCYCLE,
-4- HB26-1329

MOPED, ALL-TERRAIN VEHICLE, OFF-ROAD VEHICLE, OR VEHICLE NOT
LICENSED TO OPERATE ON A HIGHWAY OR ROADWAY.
(i) (I) "RACE" MEANS A SPEED OR ACCELERATION CONTEST,
COMPETITION, OR EXHIBITION ON A PUBLIC HIGHWAY OR ROADWAY THAT
INVOLVES TWO OR MORE DRIVERS OF MOTOR VEHICLES WHO ATTEMPT TO
OUTDISTANCE ONE ANOTHER OR OTHERWISE ACHIEVE SUPERIORITY AND
THEREBY DRIVE AT AN UNSAFE OR EXCESSIVE SPEED.
(II) A RACE MAY:
(A) BE PREARRANGED BY A DRIVER OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL;
(B) OCCUR AS THE RESULT OF A SPONTANEOUS COMPETITIVE
CHALLENGE AND RESPONSE MADE BY ONE OR MORE DRIVERS THAT, UNDER
THE CIRCUMSTANCES, CAN REASONABLY BE INTERPRETED AS A
CHALLENGE OR AGREEMENT TO RACE; OR
(C) OCCUR AS PART OF A STREET TAKEOVER OR A COORDINATED
STREET TAKEOVER.
(j) (I) "SPECTATOR" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO KNOWINGLY AND
VOLUNTARILY ATTENDS OR REMAINS PRESENT AT A RACE, DRAG RACE,
STREET TAKEOVER, OR COORDINATED STREET TAKEOVER ON A PUBLIC
HIGHWAY OR ROADWAY FOR THE PURPOSE OF VIEWING, ENCOURAGING, OR
OTHERWISE PARTICIPATING IN THE EVENT, WHEN THE INDIVIDUAL'S
PRESENCE IS THE RESULT OF AN AFFIRMATIVE CHOICE TO SUPPORT OR
ENGAGE WITH THE RACE, DRAG RACE, STREET TAKEOVER, OR
COORDINATED STREET TAKEOVER AND IS NOT MERELY THE RESULT OF
INCIDENTAL LAWFUL PRESENCE IN THE AREA.
(II) FOR THE PURPOSE OF DETERMINING WHETHER AN INDIVIDUAL
IS A SPECTATOR, A FINDER OF FACT MAY CONSIDER:
(A) THE RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN THE INDIVIDUAL AND A DRIVER
-5- HB26-1329

PARTICIPATING IN THE RACE, DRAG RACE, STREET TAKEOVER, OR
COORDINATED STREET TAKEOVER;
(B) WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL IS ENGAGED IN GAMBLING OR
BETTING ON THE OUTCOME OF THE RACE, DRAG RACE, STREET TAKEOVER,
OR COORDINATED STREET TAKEOVER;
(C) THAT THE INDIVIDUAL PHOTOGRAPHED, FILMED, OR RECORDED
THE EVENT AND WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL POSTED THE CONTENT TO
SOCIAL MEDIA; AND
(D) ANY OTHER EVIDENCE THAT MAY SHOW THAT THE INDIVIDUAL
AFFIRMATIVELY AND KNOWINGLY CHOSE TO ATTEND, VIEW, OR
PARTICIPATE IN THE RACE, DRAG RACE, STREET TAKEOVER, OR
COORDINATED STREET TAKEOVER.
(k) "STREET TAKEOVER" MEANS THE INTENTIONAL ACT BY ONE OR
MORE DRIVERS OF MOTOR VEHICLES TO OCCUPY OR BLOCK AN OPEN
PUBLIC HIGHWAY OR ROADWAY FOR THE PURPOSE OF CONDUCTING A
RACE, A DRAG RACE, STUNT DRIVING, OR ANOTHER MOTOR VEHICLE
PERFORMANCE, CONTEST, EXHIBITION, OR DISPLAY, AND WHICH ACT
THEREBY SLOWS, STOPS, OR OTHERWISE IMPEDES THE NORMAL MOVEMENT
OF OTHER MOTOR VEHICLES.
(l) "STUNT DRIVING" MEANS TO, ON A HIGHWAY OR ROADWAY OR
AS PART OF A STREET TAKEOVER, PERFORM OR ENGAGE IN:
(I) A BURNOUT;
(II) A DOUGHNUT;
(III) DRIFTING; OR
(IV) A WHEELIE.
(m) "WHEELIE" MEANS A MANEUVER PERFORMED BY A DRIVER OF
A MOTOR VEHICLE WHEREBY THE DRIVER INTENTIONALLY CAUSES ONE OR
-6- HB26-1329

MORE WHEELS, IN ANY COMBINATION OF FRONT, REAR, OR SIDE WHEELS,
TO BE RAISED OFF OF THE DRIVING SURFACE WHILE DRIVING.
(2) (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this
section, it is unlawful for a person to knowingly engage in a speed
exhibition on a highway. A PERSON SHALL NOT:
(I) INTENTIONALLY DRIVE A MOTOR VEHICLE IN A STREET
TAKEOVER, A COORDINATED STREET TAKEOVER, OR A RACE OR DRAG RACE
ON A HIGHWAY OR ROADWAY;
(II) INTENTIONALLY STUNT DRIVE ON A HIGHWAY OR ROADWAY;
(III) COORDINATE, FACILITATE, COLLECT MONEY FOR, OR
PARTICIPATE IN, IN ANY MANNER, AN EVENT THE PERSON SHOULD
REASONABLY KNOW IS A STREET TAKEOVER, A COORDINATED STREET
TAKEOVER, A RACE OR DRAG RACE, OR STUNT DRIVING;
(IV) RIDE AS A PASSENGER IN A MOTOR VEHICLE THE PERSON
SHOULD REASONABLY KNOW, WHEN THE PERSON MAKES THE DECISION TO
RIDE AS A PASSENGER, IS PARTICIPATING IN A STREET TAKEOVER, A
COORDINATED STREET TAKEOVER, A RACE OR DRAG RACE, OR STUNT
DRIVING;
(V) INTENTIONALLY CAUSE THE MOVEMENT OF TRAFFIC,
INCLUDING PEDESTRIAN TRAFFIC, TO SLOW, STOP, OR BE IMPEDED IN ANY
WAY BECAUSE OF A STREET TAKEOVER, A COORDINATED STREET
TAKEOVER, A RACE OR DRAG RACE, OR STUNT DRIVING; OR
(VI) DRIVE A MOTOR VEHICLE FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING
FUEL FOR A MOTOR VEHICLE THE PERSON SHOULD REASONABLY KNOW IS
INVOLVED IN A STREET TAKEOVER, A COORDINATED STREET TAKEOVER, A
RACE OR DRAG RACE, OR STUNT DRIVING.
(b) For purposes of this section, "speed exhibition" means the
-7- HB26-1329

operation of a motor vehicle to present a display of speed or power.
"Speed exhibition" includes, but is not limited to, squealing the tires of a
motor vehicle while it is stationary or in motion, rapid acceleration, rapid
swerving or weaving in and out of traffic, producing smoke from tire
slippage, or leaving visible tire acceleration marks on the surface of the
highway or ground.
(c) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2)(d) OF THIS SECTION,
a person who violates any provision of this subsection (2) THAT VIOLATES
SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION commits a class 2 misdemeanor
traffic offense AN UNLAWFUL EXHIBITION OF RACING OR STUNT DRIVING.
UNLAWFUL EXHIBITION OF RACING OR STUNT DRIVING IS A CLASS 1
MISDEMEANOR TRAFFIC OFFENSE AND, UPON CONVICTION, SHALL BE
PUNISHED AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II), AND THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVOKE THE PERSON'S
DRIVER'S LICENSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 42-2-127 FOR UP TO ONE
YEAR; EXCEPT THAT:
(I) A SECOND VIOLATION WITHIN ONE YEAR AFTER THE DATE OF
THE FIRST VIOLATION THAT RESULTED IN A CONVICTION IS A CLASS 6
FELONY AND, UPON CONVICTION, SHALL BE PUNISHED AS PROVIDED IN
SECTION 18-1.3-401, AND THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL REVOKE THE PERSON'S DRIVER'S LICENSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SECTION 42-2-127 FOR UP TO AN ADDITIONAL TWO YEARS; AND
(II) A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION WITHIN A FIVE-YEAR
PERIOD IS A CLASS 5 FELONY AND, UPON CONVICTION, SHALL BE PUNISHED
AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 18-1.3-401, AND THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVOKE THE PERSON'S DRIVER'S LICENSE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 42-2-127 FOR UP TO AN ADDITIONAL THREE
-8- HB26-1329

YEARS.
(d) (I) A PERSON THAT VIOLATES SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I), (2)(a)(II),
(2)(a)(V), OR (2)(a)(VI) OF THIS SECTION WHILE ENGAGED IN A
COORDINATED STREET TAKEOVER COMMITS AN UNLAWFUL COORDINATED
STREET TAKEOVER. UNLAWFUL COORDINATED STREET TAKEOVER IS A
CLASS 6 FELONY AND, UPON CONVICTION, SHALL BE PUNISHED AS
PROVIDED IN SECTION 18-1.3-401; EXCEPT THAT THE COURT SHALL IMPOSE
A FINE OF NOT LESS THAN TWO THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS AND
NOT MORE THAN FOUR THOUSAND DOLLARS, AND THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVOKE THE PERSON'S DRIVER'S
LICENSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 42-2-127 FOR UP TO TWO YEARS.
(II) A SECOND VIOLATION WITHIN ONE YEAR AFTER THE DATE OF
THE FIRST VIOLATION THAT RESULTED IN A CONVICTION IS A CLASS 6
FELONY IF BOTH VIOLATIONS ARE UNLAWFUL COORDINATED STREET
TAKEOVERS AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)(d)(I) OF THIS SECTION AND,
UPON CONVICTION, SHALL BE PUNISHED AS PROVIDED IN SECTION
18-1.3-401; EXCEPT THAT THE COURT SHALL IMPOSE A FINE OF NOT LESS
THAN THREE THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS AND NOT MORE THAN
FIVE THOUSAND DOLLARS, AND THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REVOKE THE PERSON'S DRIVER'S LICENSE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 42-2-127 FOR UP TO AN ADDITIONAL TWO
YEARS.
(III) A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION WITHIN A FIVE-YEAR
PERIOD AFTER THE DATE OF THE FIRST VIOLATION IS A CLASS 5 FELONY IF
ALL VIOLATIONS ARE UNLAWFUL COORDINATED STREET TAKEOVERS AS
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)(d)(I) OF THIS SECTION AND, UPON
CONVICTION, SHALL BE PUNISHED AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 18-1.3-401;
-9- HB26-1329

EXCEPT THAT THE COURT SHALL IMPOSE A FINE OF NOT LESS THAN FOUR
THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS AND NOT MORE THAN SIX THOUSAND
DOLLARS, AND THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
REVOKE THE PERSON'S DRIVER'S LICENSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
42-2-127 FOR UP TO AN ADDITIONAL THREE YEARS.
(e) (I) A PERSON SHALL NOT KNOWINGLY BE A SPECTATOR TO A
RACE, DRAG RACE, STREET TAKEOVER, OR COORDINATED STREET
TAKEOVER PROHIBITED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(II) A PERSON THAT VIOLATES SUBSECTION (2)(e)(I) OF THIS
SECTION COMMITS A CLASS B TRAFFIC INFRACTION AND SHALL BE SUBJECT
TO PENALTIES AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 42-4-1701 (3)(a).
(2.1) (a) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 16-3-102 (1), A PEACE
OFFICER MAY ARREST AND TAKE INTO CUSTODY A PERSON THAT VIOLATES
SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) WHEN A COURT HEARS A CASE IN WHICH A PERSON IS CHARGED
WITH A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION:
(I) THE ARRESTING OFFICER OR PROSECUTOR SHALL PROVIDE THE
COURT A COPY OF THE DRIVING RECORD OF THE PERSON CHARGED; AND
(II) THE COURT SHALL OBTAIN ANY RECORDS NECESSARY TO
DETERMINE IF THE PERSON CHARGED HAS ONE OR MORE PRIOR
CONVICTIONS FOR VIOLATING SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) (I) A COURT THAT HEARS A CASE IN WHICH A PERSON IS
CHARGED WITH A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION MAY
ENTER AN ORDER OF IMPOUNDMENT OR IMMOBILIZATION OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE THE PERSON WAS DRIVING DURING THE VIOLATION AS PART OF
SENTENCING THE PERSON TO INCARCERATION OR AS A CONDITION OF
PROBATION.
-10- HB26-1329

(II) WITHIN SEVEN BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE COURT
ISSUES AN ORDER OF IMPOUNDMENT OR IMMOBILIZATION PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2.1)(c)(I) OF THIS SECTION, THE CLERK OF THE COURT SHALL
SEND NOTICE OF THE ORDER BY CERTIFIED MAIL WITH RETURN RECEIPT
REQUESTED TO:
(A) THE REGISTERED OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE IF THE
REGISTERED OWNER IS NOT THE PERSON THAT WAS ARRESTED; AND
(B) A PERSON OF RECORD CLAIMING A LIEN AGAINST THE MOTOR
VEHICLE.
(III) (A) AN IMPOUNDING AGENCY SHALL RELEASE A MOTOR
VEHICLE THAT WAS IMPOUNDED OR IMMOBILIZED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2.1)(c)(I) OF THIS SECTION TO THE OWNER OR PERSON
ENTITLED TO POSSESSION UNDER THE CONDITIONS SET FORTH IN SECTION
42-13-106.
(B) UNLESS THE COURT DISMISSES THE ORDER OF IMPOUNDMENT
OR IMMOBILIZATION, ALL COSTS AND FEES ASSOCIATED WITH THE
IMPOUNDMENT OR IMMOBILIZATION ORDERED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(2.1)(c)(I) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING THE COST OF THE NOTICE, SHALL
BE PAID BY THE PERSON CHARGED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(d) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (2.1)(c) OF THIS SECTION, IF
A PEACE OFFICER ARRESTS AND TAKES INTO CUSTODY A PERSON DRIVING
A MOTOR VEHICLE IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION,
THE MOTOR VEHICLE MAY BE IMPOUNDED IMMEDIATELY TO STORE THE
VEHICLE AS EVIDENCE OR TO BEGIN ASSET FORFEITURE PROCEEDINGS AS
PERMITTED BY LAW.
(e) A MOTOR VEHICLE USED IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (2)(a)
OF THIS SECTION MAY BE IMPOUNDED FOR SAFEKEEPING, AS EVIDENCE, OR
-11- HB26-1329

FOR ASSET FORFEITURE IF:
(I) THE OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE CANNOT BE VERIFIED; OR
(II) THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS NOT REGISTERED WITH THE
DEPARTMENT.
(3) (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this
section, a person shall not, for the purpose of facilitating or aiding or as
an incident to any speed contest or speed exhibition upon a highway, in
any manner obstruct or place a barricade or obstruction, or assist or
participate in placing any such barricade or obstruction, upon a highway.
(b) A person who violates any provision of this subsection (3)
commits, pursuant to section 42-4-1703, the offense that the person aided
in or facilitated the commission of. Nothing in this subsection (3) shall be
construed to preclude charging a person under section 42-4-1703 for
otherwise being a party to the crime of engaging in a speed contest or
engaging in a speed exhibition.
(5) (a) In addition to a sentence imposed pursuant to this section
or pursuant to any other provision of law:
(I) Upon the second conviction for an offense specified in
subsection (1) or (2) (2)(a) of this section, or any other crime, the
underlying factual basis of which has been found by the court to include
an act of operating a motor vehicle in violation of subsection (1) or (2)
(2)(a) of this section, the court may, in its discretion, order the primary
law enforcement agency involved with the case to place an
immobilization device on the motor vehicle or motor vehicles so operated
for a period of up to fourteen days.
(II) (A) Upon the third or subsequent conviction for an offense
specified in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, or any other crime, the
-12- HB26-1329

underlying factual basis of which has been found by the court to include
an act of operating a motor vehicle in violation of subsection (1) or (2) of
this section, the court may, in its discretion, order the primary law
enforcement agency involved with the case to place an immobilization
device on the motor vehicle or motor vehicles so operated for a period of
up to thirty days but more than fourteen days A MOTOR VEHICLE MAY BE
SUBJECT TO THE PROCEDURES APPLIED TO SEIZED PROPERTY SET FORTH IN
SECTIONS 16-13-505 TO 16-13-510 IF THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS USED IN
VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION BY A PERSON THAT HAS
TWO OR MORE PRIOR CONVICTIONS FOR VIOLATIONS OF SUBSECTION (2)(a)
OF THIS SECTION WITHIN THE FIVE YEARS BEFORE THE VIOLATION THAT
RESULTED IN A CONVICTION.
(B) SUBSECTION (5)(a)(II)(A) OF THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A
PERSON CONVICTED OF THE VIOLATIONS OF SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS
SECTION WITHIN THE FIVE YEARS BEFORE THE VIOLATION THAT RESULTED
IN A CONVICTION ONLY IF THE PERSON IS THE REGISTERED OWNER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE TO BE SEIZED.
(d) For purposes of this section, "immobilization device" means
a device locked into place over a wheel of a motor vehicle that prevents
the motor vehicle from being moved. "Immobilization device" includes
but is not limited to a device commonly referred to as a "traffic boot" or
"boot".
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-2-127, amend
(5)(c) as follows:
42-2-127. Authority to suspend license - to deny license - type
of conviction - points.
(5) Point system schedule:
-13- HB26-1329

Type of conviction Points
(c) (I) Engaging in a speed contest in violation of section
42-4-1105 (1) INTENTIONALLY DRIVING A MOTOR VEHICLE IN A STREET
TAKEOVER, A COORDINATED STREET TAKEOVER, OR A RACE OR DRAG RACE
IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 42-4-1105 (2)(a)(I) . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
(II) Aiding or facilitating engaging in a speed contest in violation
of section 42-4-1105 (3) INTENTIONALLY STUNT DRIVING IN VIOLATION OF
SECTION 42-4-1105 (2)(a)(II) . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
(III) Engaging in a speed exhibition in violation of section
42-4-1105 (2) . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
(IV) Aiding or facilitating engaging in a speed exhibition in
violation of section 42-4-1105 (3) DRIVING A MOTOR VEHICLE FOR THE
PURPOSE OF PROVIDING FUEL FOR A MOTOR VEHICLE THE PERSON SHOULD
REASONABLY KNOW IS INVOLVED IN A STREET TAKEOVER, A COORDINATED
STREET TAKEOVER, A RACE OR DRAG RACE, OR STUNT DRIVING IN
VIOLATION OF SECTION 42-4-1105 (2)(a)(VI) . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5 12
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-9-116.5, amend
(1) and (2)(a) as follows:
18-9-116.5. Vehicular eluding.
(1) Any A person who, while operating a motor vehicle,
knowingly eludes or attempts to elude a peace officer also operating a
motor vehicle, and who knows or reasonably should know that he or she
is THEY ARE being pursued by said A peace officer, and who operates his
or her THEIR vehicle in a reckless manner, commits vehicular eluding.
(2) (a) Vehicular eluding is a class 5 felony; except that:
(I) Vehicular eluding that results in bodily injury to another person
is a class 4 felony; and
-14- HB26-1329

(II) Vehicular eluding that results in death to another person is a
class 3 felony; AND
(III) VEHICULAR ELUDING COMMITTED BY A DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE IN CONNECTION WITH OR IMMEDIATELY AFTER A VIOLATION OF
SECTION 42-4-1105 (2)(a)(I), (2)(a)(II), (2)(a)(III), (2)(a)(V), OR
(2)(a)(VI) IS A CLASS 4 FELONY.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-110.5, add (9)
as follows:
42-4-110.5. Automated vehicle identification systems - school
buses - exceptions to liability - penalty - contracting - limits on use of
photographs and video - rules - legislative declaration - definitions.
(9) AN AUTOMATED VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM INSTALLED
AND UTILIZED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MAY BE USED TO ASSIST IN AN
INVESTIGATION TO IDENTIFY A MOTOR VEHICLE USED IN VIOLATION OF
SECTION 42-4-1105.
SECTION 5. Effective date - applicability. This act takes effect
June 15, 2026, and applies to offenses committed on or after said date.
SECTION 6. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-15- HB26-1329